Nebraska, session 109, LB1172.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1172 LB1172
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 70-1034, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
70-1034 (1) For purposes of this section, dispatchable electric
generation facility means a facility that, under normal operating
conditions, can increase or decrease its output on demand to provide
electricity onto the electric power transmission grid on an ongoing
basis.
(2)(a) If a public power district, a public power and irrigation
district, an electric membership association, an electric cooperative
company, a municipality having a generation and distribution system, or a
registered group of municipalities decides that a dispatchable electric
generation facility with a generation capacity in excess of one hundred
megawatts owned by any such entity should be closed or decommissioned,
such entity shall provide written notice to the Nebraska Power Review
Board prior to a final decision to close or decommission such facility.
Such written notice shall include recommendations on necessary transition
activities to avoid economic harm to workers at such facility or to an
affected community. Transition activities include, but are not
necessarily limited to:
(i) Educating workers regarding the availability of various
assistance programs, including what options are available to maintain
employment with such entity;
(ii) Explaining what severance pay will be available to workers;
(iii) Services for workers including education and job training,
career counseling, skills-matching, and financial planning assistance;
and
(iv) Promoting economic development opportunities in the affected
community, including the creation of comparable jobs.
(b) The board, in its discretion, may set a time and place for
hearing on the matter and provide at least twenty days' prior notice to
such entity. The hearing shall be held within sixty days after such
-2-

LB1172 LB1172
2026 2026
notice unless such entity requests in writing that the hearing not be
scheduled until a later time. Any such hearing shall be closed to the
public due to the proprietary and commercial information discussed. If
the board determines that no hearing is necessary, the board shall
provide written notice of such determination to such entity within thirty
days after receipt of the written notice described in subdivision (2)(a)
of this section.
(3) Within sixty days after the hearing or the determination that no
hearing is necessary as described in subsection (2) of this section, the
board shall make recommendations in writing on the basis of the record
before the board as to whether closing or decommissioning the
dispatchable electric generation facility is in the best interests of the
entity deciding to close or decommission the dispatchable electric
generation facility and its customers. Such recommendations shall be
advisory only. Such entity shall consider the board's recommendations
before making its final decision regarding the closing or decommissioning
of the electric generation facility.
(4) The notices, the scheduling decisions concerning the hearing and
purpose of the hearing, the record of the hearing, the board's
recommendations, and any response by the entity deciding to close or
decommission the dispatchable electric generation facility shall all be
treated as confidential records that are not subject to public disclosure
pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 until such time as such entity
publicly announces any decision to close or decommission the dispatchable
electric generation facility. Nothing in this subsection shall be
construed to require public disclosure of any information that may be
withheld as provided in section 70-673 or 84-712.05.
(5) This section shall not apply to any decision by a public power
district, a public power and irrigation district, an electric membership
association, an electric cooperative company, a municipality having a
generation and distribution system, or a registered group of
-3-

LB1172 LB1172
2026 2026
municipalities to close or decommission a dispatchable electric
generation facility made prior to April 16, 2024.
(6)(a) An electric supplier shall maintain seventy-five percent of
the dispatchable electricity capacity in the generation portfolio of such
electric supplier.
(b) An electric supplier shall certify to the Nebraska Power Review
Board on an annual basis whether such electric supplier is in or out of
compliance with subdivision (6)(a) of this section. If an electric
supplier is out of compliance, such electric supplier shall provide a
plan to become compliant to the board within sixty days of being out of
compliance.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Dispatchable electricity means a source of electricity that is
readily available for use on demand and can be dispatched upon request of
a power grid operator, or a source of electricity that can have the power
output of such source adjusted according to market needs, except for
routine maintenance or repairs; and
(ii) Capacity means the maximum amount of electric power that a
power plant can supply at a specific point in time under specific
circumstances.
Sec. 2. Original section 70-1034, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-